District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.11

Open meetings.

The executive and advisory boards shall be subject to subchapter IV of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-571 et seq.]; except, that the executive board may hold closed sessions when considering matters related to litigation, personnel, contracting, or rates.

History

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 12, 59 DCR 213